Louisiana, session 2026, SB276.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1558.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1558.1. Appointments; bail bond producer; affidavit; cancellation; appeal
A.(1) Before receiving an appointment, a bail bond producer shall
submit to the commissioner an affidavit, signed under oath by the bail bond
producer and by all former insurers, stating that the bail bond producer does
not owe any premium or unsatisfied judgment to any insurer and that the bail
bond producer agrees to discharge all outstanding forfeitures and judgments
on bonds previously written.
(2) The affidavit shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and
shall be submitted by the bail bond producer to the former insurer.
B.(1) If the bail bond producer does not satisfy or discharge all
forfeitures or judgments, a former insurer shall submit a notice, with
supporting documents, to the appointing insurer, the bail bond producer, and
the commissioner, which states, under oath, that the bail bond producer has
failed to satisfy, in a timely manner, all forfeitures and judgments on bonds
written by the bail bond producer and that the former insurer has satisfied a
forfeiture or judgment from its own funds. The former insurer shall submit the
notice and supporting documents no later than thirty days after the former
insurer receives the affidavit from the bail bond producer.
(2) Upon receipt of the notice and supporting documents, the appointing
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 276 ENROLLED
insurer shall immediately cancel the bail bond producer's appointment. The
bail bond producer may be reappointed only upon certification by the former
insurer that all forfeitures and judgments on bonds written by the bail bond
producer have been discharged.
(3) The appointing insurer or bail bond producer may appeal to the
commissioner no later than ten days after receiving the notice and supporting
documents from the former insurer.
C. The commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations, in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, necessary to implement and
enforce this Section, including but not limited to rules regarding the procedures
for appeals and stays of the provisions of this Section.
D. As used in this Section, "former insurer" means an insurer with
whom the bail bond producer had a prior appointment and who is responsible
for any outstanding bonds written by the bail bond producer.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.